Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 1.4 Citizens’ Commission for the Safety and Care of the Elderly

12-1.4-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Citizens’ Commission for the Safety and Care of the Elderly.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 407, § 1.

12-1.4-2.
Creation.

There is established within the department of elderly affairs the citizens’ commission for the safety and care of the elderly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 407, § 1; 1996, ch. 100, art. 45, § 1.

12-1.4-3.
Purpose.

The purpose of the commission shall be to act as a liaison between the legislature, public safety officials, the office of healthy aging, and the older population of Rhode Island in the area of crime against the elderly, fire safety, and protective service options available to the elderly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 275, § 1.

12-1.4-4.
Membership.

The commission shall consist of twenty-one (21) members, eight (8) of whom shall be older citizens appointed by the speaker and seven (7) of whom shall be older citizens appointed by the president of the senate. The speaker shall appoint three (3) members and the president of the senate shall appoint two (2) members for terms of three (3) years; the speaker shall appoint three (3) members and the president of the senate shall appoint two (2) members for terms of two (2) years; and the speaker shall appoint two (2) members and the president of the senate shall appoint three (3) members for a term of one year. These terms shall commence with the date of appointment and expire on the January 31 after the appointment corresponding with the number of years of the term to which appointed. Appointments shall be made for terms of three (3) years commencing on February 1 in the year of appointment and ending on January 31 in the third year after the appointment. Any vacancy among the members shall be filled by the appointing authority for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The remaining six (6) members of the commission shall be the president of the Police Chiefs’ Association or his or her designee; the attorney general or his or her designee; the director of elderly affairs or his or her designee; a representative of the state police appointed by the superintendent of the state police, the president of the fire chief’s association, or his or her designee and the state fire marshal or his or her designee; all six (6) of whom shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years.

The members of the commission shall meet at the call of the speaker of the house and organize and shall select a chairperson from among themselves.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 12; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 10; P.L. 2005, ch. 275, § 1.

12-1.4-5.
Compensation and expenses.

The membership of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be allowed their travel and necessary expenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 407, § 1.

12-1.4-6.
Staff.

The commission may engage any clerical, technical, and other assistance that it may deem necessary, and spend any other funds necessary to accomplish its purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 407, § 1.

12-1.4-7.
Cooperation of departments.

All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish any advice and information, documentary and otherwise, to the commission and its agents deemed necessary or desirable by the commission to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.

Each local police and fire chief shall designate at least one police officer or fire fighter to serve as the department’s “senior citizen police advocate” to work as a liaison between the department and the elderly community to help address elderly safety and protection issues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 275, § 1.

12-1.4-8.
Quarters.

The speaker of the house is authorized and directed to provide suitable quarters for the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 407, § 1.

12-1.4-9.
Reports to general assembly.

The commission shall report its findings and recommendations regarding the improvement of elder safety issues to the general assembly on or before January 25 of each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 275, § 1.

12-1.4-10.
Appropriation.

The sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be annually appropriated, out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of that sum, or as much of that sum as may be deemed necessary, from time to time, upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 13, § 1.